Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-213.01
Village engineer; powers and duties.

(1) The village engineer, when ordered to do so by the village board of trustees, shall make surveys, estimates, and calculations necessary to be made for the establishment and maintenance of public works by the village.

(2) The village board of trustees may, in lieu of appointing a village engineer, employ a special engineer to perform the duties that would otherwise be performed by the village engineer. Any work executed by such special engineer shall have the same validity and serve in all respects as though executed by the village engineer.

Laws 2017, LB133, § 77.